Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-13] Eminent domain, exchange or use
of public property. The corporation may acquire any real property,
including fixtures and improvements, or interest therein: through voluntary
negotiation; through exchange of land in accordance with section 171-50,
provided that the public land to be exchanged need not be of like use to that
of the private land; or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain which it
deems necessary by the adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition
of the property described therein is in the public interest and required for
public use. The corporation shall exercise the power of eminent domain granted
by this section in the same manner and procedure as is provided by chapter 101
and otherwise in accordance with all applicable provisions of the general laws
of the State; provided that condemnation of parcels greater than fifteen acres
shall be subject to legislative disapproval expressed in a concurrent
resolution adopted by majority vote of the senate and the house of
representatives in the first regular or special session following the date of
condemnation.

The corporation may acquire by the exercise of
the power of eminent domain property already devoted to a public use; provided
that no property belonging to any government may be acquired without its
consent, and that no property belonging to a public utility corporation may be
acquired without the approval of the public utilities commission, and subject
to legislative disapproval expressed in a concurrent resolution adopted by
majority vote of the senate and the house of representatives in the first
regular or special session following the date of condemnation. [L 2005, c 196,
pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §15]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next